Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-513
Annual tax levy; limit; certification to county clerk; collection; disbursement of funds.

(1) The board of trustees may levy and collect annually taxes for corporate purposes upon property within the limits of such sanitary district to the amount of not more than three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of the taxable property of such district.

(2) The board of trustees shall, on or before September 30 of each year, certify the amount of tax to be levied to the county clerk who shall place the proper levy upon the county tax list, and the tax shall be collected by the county treasurer in the same manner as county taxes.

(3) The tax money collected by the levy shall be used exclusively for the purpose or purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The county treasurer shall disburse the taxes on warrants of the board of trustees, and in respect to such fund, the county treasurer shall be ex officio treasurer of the sanitary district.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 9, p. 290;

R.S.1913, § 1932;

C.S.1922, § 1873;

C.S.1929, § 31-611;

Laws 1943, c. 73, § 1, p. 255;

R.S.1943, § 31-513;

Laws 1947, c. 113, § 1, p. 308;

Laws 1951, c. 97, § 1, p. 266;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 51, p. 960;

Laws 1955, c. 114, § 1, p. 305;

Laws 1969, c. 248, § 2, p. 907;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 32, p. 692;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 136;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 28;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 36;

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 9;

Laws 2021, LB644, § 14.